Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 2. Holding of Securities

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2004, ch. 14, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2004.

§ 26-8-201.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Clearing corporation” means a corporation as defined in W.S. 34.1-8-102(a)(v), except that with respect to securities issued by institutions organized or existing under the laws of any foreign country or securities used to meet the deposit requirements pursuant to the laws of a foreign country as a condition of doing business therein, clearing corporation may include a corporation which is organized or existing under the laws of any foreign country and is legally qualified under those laws to effect transactions in securities by computerized book-entry. Clearing corporation also includes the “treasury/reserve automated debt entry securities system” and the “treasury direct” book-entry securities systems established pursuant to 31 U.S.C. § 3100, et seq., 12 U.S.C part 391 and 5 U.S.C. part 301;

through (iv) Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 44, § 3.

“Security” means as defined in W.S. 34.1-8-102(a)(xv);

“Custodian” means a national bank, state bank or a trust company which participates in a clearing corporation.

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 14, § 1; 2007, ch. 44, §§ 2, 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a) added the last sentence in (i), repealed (ii) through (iv) pertaining to the definitions of “‘Direct participant,’” “‘Federal reserve book-entry system,’” and “‘Bank,’” and added (vi).

§ 26-8-202.
Use of book-entry systems.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, but subject to W.S.

26-24-129

, a domestic insurer may deposit or arrange for the deposit of securities held in or purchased for its general account and its separate accounts in a clearing corporation. When securities are deposited with a clearing corporation, certificates representing securities of the same class of the same issuer may be merged and held in bulk in the name of the nominee of the clearing corporation with any other securities deposited with the clearing corporation by any person, regardless of the ownership of the securities, and certificates representing securities of small denominations may be merged into one (1) or more certificates of larger denominations. The records of any custodian through which an insurer holds securities in a clearing corporation, shall at all times show that the securities are held for the insurer and the accounts in which they are held. Ownership of, and other interests in, the securities may be transferred by bookkeeping entry on the books of the clearing corporation without physical delivery of certificates representing the securities.

The commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations governing the deposit by insurers of securities with clearing corporations, including establishing standards for national banks, state banks and trust companies to qualify as custodians for insurance company securities.

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 14, § 1; 2007, ch. 44, § 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, deleted “or the federal reserve book entry system” in (a) and (b); in (a), substituted “custodian” for “bank,” deleted “and the records of any custodian banks through which an insurer holds securities in” preceding “a clearing corporation,” and deleted “in either case” preceding “physical”; in (b), substituted “insurers” for “insurance companies” and inserted “including establishing records for national banks, state banks and trust companies to qualify as custodians for insurance company securities.”

§ 26-8-203.
Deposit of securities by insurers.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the securities qualified for deposit under this chapter may be deposited with a clearing corporation. Securities deposited with a clearing corporation and used to meet the deposit requirements set forth in chapter 3 of this code shall be under the control of the commissioner and shall not be withdrawn by the insurer without the approval of the commissioner. Any insurer holding securities in this manner shall provide to the commissioner evidence issued by its custodian through which the insurer has deposited the securities in a clearing corporation in order to establish that the securities are actually recorded in an account in the name of the custodian and that the records of the custodian reflect that the securities are held subject to the order of the commissioner.

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 14, § 1; 2007, ch. 44, § 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, rewrote this section by deleting references to the “federal reserve book entry system” throughout and updated an internal reference to “chapter 3 of this code.”

§ 26-8-204.
Deposit of securities by foreign insurers.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, securities eligible for deposit under the insurance laws of this state relating to deposit of securities by an insurer as a condition of commencing or continuing to do an insurance business in this state may be deposited with a clearing corporation. Securities deposited with a clearing corporation and used to meet the deposit requirements under the insurance laws of this state shall be under the control of the commissioner and shall not be withdrawn by the insurer without the approval of the commissioner. Any insurer holding securities in this manner shall provide to the commissioner evidence issued by its custodian in order to establish that the securities are actually recorded in an account in the name of the custodian and evidence that the records of the custodian reflect that the securities are held subject to the order of the commissioner.

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 14, § 1; 2007, ch. 44, § 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, rewrote this section by deleting references to the “federal reserve book entry system” throughout, deleted “or other direct participant or bank” following “name of the custodian,” and made similar and stylistic changes.